California statutes. Family Code
(j) The fees, commissions, expenses, and the reasonable costs associated with the sale of property levied upon by warrant or levy pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, appraisers’ fees, auctioneers’ fees, and advertising fees are an obligation of the support obligor and may be collected from the obligor by virtue of the
 warrant or levy or in any other manner as though these items were support payments delinquent for at least 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 157.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17522.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8112 of the Commercial Code and Section 700.130 of the Code of Civil Procedure, when a local child support agency pursuant to Section 17522, or the department pursuant to Section 17454 or 17500, issues a levy upon, or requires by notice any employer, person, political officer or entity, or depository institution to withhold the amount of, as applicable, a financial asset for the purpose of collecting a delinquent child support obligation, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary (as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code) in possession or control of the financial asset shall liquidate the financial asset in a commercially reasonable manner within 20 days of the issuance of the levy or the
 notice to withhold. Within five days of liquidation, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary shall transfer to the State Disbursement Unit, established under Section 17309, the proceeds of the liquidation, less any reasonable commissions or fees, or both, which are charged in the normal course of business.

(b) If the value of the financial assets exceed the total amount of support due, the obligor may, within 10 days after the service of the levy or notice to withhold upon the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary, instruct the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary who possesses or controls the financial assets as to which financial assets are to be sold to satisfy the obligation for delinquent support. If the obligor does not provide instructions for liquidation, the person, financial institution, or securities intermediary who possesses or controls the financial assets shall
 liquidate the financial assets in a commercially reasonable manner and in an amount sufficient to cover the obligation for delinquent child support, and any reasonable commissions or fees, or both, which are charged in the normal course of business, beginning with the financial assets purchased most recently.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a financial asset shall include, but not be limited to, an uncertificated security, certificated security, or security entitlement (as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code), security (as defined in Section 8103 of the Commercial Code), or a securities account (as defined in Section 8501 of the Commercial Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 474, Sec. 22.   (AB 2882)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17523.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a support obligor is delinquent in the payment of support and the local child support agency is enforcing the support obligation pursuant to Section 17400 or 17402, a lien for child support shall arise against the personal property of the support obligor in either of the following circumstances:

(1) By operation of law for all amounts of overdue support, regardless of whether the amounts have been adjudicated or otherwise determined.

(2) When either a court having continuing jurisdiction or the local child support agency determines a specific amount of arrearages is owed by the support obligor.

(b) The lien for child support shall be perfected by filing a notice of child support lien with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 697.510 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Once filed, the child support lien shall have the same
 priority, force, and effect as a judgment lien on personal property pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 697.510) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of Article 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Notice of child support lien” means a document filed with the Secretary of State that substantially complies with the requirements of Section 697.530 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) “Support obligor is delinquent in payment of support” means that the support obligor has failed to make payment equal to one month’s support obligation.

(3) “Personal property” means that property that is subject to attachment by a judgment lien pursuant to Section 697.530 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Nothing in this section shall affect the priority of any of the following interests:

(1) State tax liens as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 7170) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(2) Liens or security interests as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 697.510) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of Article 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) As between competing child support liens and state tax liens, a child support lien arising under this section shall have priority over a state tax lien if (1) the child support lien is filed with the Secretary of State, (2) the notice of child support lien is filed in an action or proceeding in which the obligor may become entitled to property or money judgment, or (3) the levy for child support on personal property is made, before a notice of state tax lien is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 7171 of the Government Code or filed in an action or proceeding in accordance with Section 7173 of the Government Code.

(f) A personal property lien for child support arising in another state may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as a personal property lien arising in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 980, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17523.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in connection with the duty of the department and the local child support agency to promptly and effectively collect and enforce child support obligations under Title IV-D, the transmission, filing, and recording of a lien record by departmental and local child support agency staff that arises pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4506 of this code or Section 697.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure against the real property of a support obligor in the form of a digital or a digitized electronic record shall be permitted and governed only by this section.

(2) A facsimile signature that complies with the requirements of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 27201 of the Government Code shall be accepted on any document relating to a lien that is filed or recorded pursuant to this section.

(3) The department and the local child support agency may use the California Child Support Enforcement System to transmit, file, and record a lien record under this section.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a county recorder to establish an electronic recording delivery system or to enter into a contract with an entity to implement this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Digital electronic record” means a record containing information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received,
 or stored by electronic means, but not created in original paper form.

(2) “Digitized electronic record” means a scanned image of the original paper document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 474, Sec. 23.   (AB 2882)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17524.

(a) Upon making application to the local child support agency for child support enforcement services pursuant to Section 17400, every applicant shall be requested to give the local child support agency a statement of arrearages stating whether any support arrearages are owed. If the applicant alleges arrearages are owed, the statement shall be signed under penalty of perjury.

(b) For all cases opened by the district attorney or local child support agency after December 31, 1995, the local child support agency shall enforce only arrearages declared under penalty of perjury pursuant to subdivision (a), arrearages accrued after the case was opened, or arrearages determined by the court in the child support action. Arrearages may be determined by judgment, noticed motion, renewal of judgment, or registration of the support order.

(c) For all cases opened by the district attorney on or before December 31, 1995, the
 local child support agency shall enforce only arrearages that have been based upon a statement of arrearages signed under penalty of perjury or where the local child support agency has some other reasonable basis for believing the amount of claimed arrearages to be correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17525.

(a) Whenever a state or local governmental agency issues a notice of support delinquency, the notice shall state the date upon which the amount of the delinquency was calculated, and shall notify the obligor that the amount calculated may, or may not, include accrued interest. This requirement shall not be imposed until the local child support agency has instituted the California Child Support Enforcement System implemented and maintained by the Department of Child Support Services pursuant to Section 17308. The notice shall further notify the obligor of the right to an administrative determination of arrears by requesting that the local child support agency review the arrears, but that payments on arrears continue to be due and payable unless
 and
 until the local child support agency notifies the obligor otherwise. A state agency shall not be required to suspend enforcement of any arrearages as a result of the obligor’s request for an administrative determination of arrears, unless the agency receives notification of a suspension pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17526.

(b) For purposes of this section, “notice of support delinquency” means a notice issued to a support obligor that includes a specific statement of the amount of delinquent support due and payable.

(c) This section does not require a state or local entity to calculate the amount of a support delinquency, except as otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 158.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17526.

(a) Upon request of an obligor or obligee, the local child support agency shall review the amount of arrearages alleged in a statement of arrearages that may be submitted to the local child support agency by an applicant for child support enforcement services. The local child support agency shall complete the review in the same manner and pursuant to the same timeframes as a complaint submitted pursuant to Section 17800. In the review, the local child support agency shall consider all evidence and defenses submitted by either parent on the issues of the amount of support paid or owed.

(b) The local child support agency may, in its discretion, suspend enforcement or distribution of arrearages if it believes there is a substantial probability that the result of the administrative review will result in a finding that there are no arrearages.

(c) Any party to an action involving child support enforcement services
 of the local child support agency may request a judicial determination of arrearages. The party may request an administrative review of the alleged arrearages prior to requesting a judicial determination of arrearages. The local child support agency shall complete the review in the same manner and pursuant to the same timeframes specified in subdivision (a). Any motion to determine arrearages filed with the court shall include a monthly breakdown showing amounts ordered and amounts paid, in addition to any other relevant information.

(d) A county that submits a claim for reimbursement as a state-mandated local program of costs incurred with respect to the administrative review of alleged child support arrearages under this section shall be ineligible for state subventions or, to the extent permitted by federal law, state-administered federal subventions, for child support in the amount of any local costs under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 927, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17528.

(a) As authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the following actions shall be taken in order to enforce support obligations that are not being met:

(1) Within 18 months of implementation of the California Child Support Enforcement System (CSE), or its replacement as prescribed by former Section 10815 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and certification of CSE or its replacement by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the department shall compile a file of all support judgments and orders that are being enforced by local child support agencies pursuant to Section 17400 that have sums overdue by at least 60 days or by an
 amount
 equal to 60 days of support.

(2) The file shall contain the name and social security number of the person who owes overdue support, the amount of overdue support as of the date the file is created, the name of the county in which the support obligation is being enforced by the local child support agency, and any other information that is deemed necessary by the department and the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(3) The department shall provide the certified file to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the purpose of matching the names in the file with members and beneficiaries of the Public Employees’ Retirement System that are entitled to receive Public Employees’ Retirement System benefits. The department and the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall
 work cooperatively to develop an interface in order to match the names in their respective electronic data processing systems. The interface required to intercept benefits that are payable periodically shall be done as soon as it is technically feasible.

(4) The department shall update the certified file no less than on a monthly basis to add new cases within the local child support agencies or existing cases that become delinquent and to delete persons who are no longer delinquent. The department shall provide the updated file no less than on a monthly basis to the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(5) Information contained in the certified file provided to the Public Employees’ Retirement System by the department and the local child support agencies and information provided
 by the Public Employees’ Retirement System to the department shall be used exclusively for child support enforcement purposes and may not be used for any other purpose.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall withhold the amount certified from the benefits and refunds to be distributed to members with overdue support obligations or from benefits to be distributed to beneficiaries with overdue support obligations. If the benefits are payable periodically, the amount withheld pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount permitted to be withheld for an earnings withholding order for support under Section 706.052 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall forward the amounts withheld
 pursuant to subdivision (b) within 10 days of withholding to the department for distribution to the appropriate county.

(d) On an annual basis, the department shall notify individuals with overdue support obligations that PERS benefits or PERS contribution refunds may be intercepted for the purpose of
 enforcing family support obligations.

(e) No later than the time of the first withholding, the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall send those persons subject to withholding the following:

(1) Notice that the person’s benefits or retirement contribution refund have been reduced by payment on a support judgment pursuant to this section.

(2) A form developed by the department that the applicant shall use to request either a review by the local child support agency or a court hearing, as appropriate.

(f) The notice shall include the address and telephone number of the local child support agency that is enforcing the support obligation
 pursuant to Section 17400, and shall specify that the form requesting either a review by the local child support agency or a court hearing must be received by the local child support agency within 20 days of the date of the notice.

(g) The form shall include instructions that are designed to enable the member or beneficiary to obtain a review or a court hearing as appropriate on their own behalf. The form shall specify that if the member or beneficiary disputes the amount of support arrearages certified by the local child support agency pursuant to this section, the member or beneficiary may request a review by the local child support agency.

(h) The department shall develop procedures that are consistent with this section to be used by each local child support agency in conducting
 the requested review. The local child support agency shall complete the review in accordance with the procedures developed by the department and shall notify the member or beneficiary of the result of the review within 20 days of receiving the request for review. The notification of review results shall
 include a request for hearing form and shall inform the member or beneficiary that if the member or beneficiary returns the completed request for hearing form within 20 days of the date of the notice of review results, the local child support agency shall calendar the matter for court review. If the local child support agency cannot complete the review within 20 days, the local child support agency shall calendar the matter for hearing as specified in subdivision (k).

(i) The form specified in subdivision (g) shall also notify the member or beneficiary that the member or beneficiary may request a court hearing to claim an exemption of any benefit not payable periodically by returning the completed form to the local child support agency within 20 days. If the local child support agency receives a timely request for a hearing
 for a claim of exemption, the local child support agency shall calendar a court hearing. The amount of the exemption, if any, shall be determined by the court in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 703.070 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(j) If the local child support agency receives the form requesting either a review by the local child support agency or a court hearing within the 20 days specified in subdivision (f), the local child support agency shall not distribute the amount intercepted until the review by the local child support agency or the court hearing is completed. If the local child support agency determines that all or a portion of the member’s or beneficiary’s benefits were intercepted in error, or if the court determines that any amount of the benefits are exempt, the local child support agency shall refund any
 amount determined to be exempt or intercepted in excess of the correct amount to the member or beneficiary within 10 days of determination that a refund is due.

(k) A hearing properly requested pursuant to this section shall be calendared by the local child support agency. The hearing shall be held within 20 days from the date that the local child support agency receives the request for hearing. The local child support agency shall provide notice of the time and place for hearing by first-class mail no later than five days prior to the hearing.

(l) This section does not limit any existing rights of the member or beneficiary, including, but not limited to, the right to seek a determination of arrearages or other appropriate relief directly from the court. However, if the
 procedures of this section are not utilized by the member or beneficiary, the court may not require the local child support agency to refund any money that was distributed to the child support obligee prior to the local child support agency receiving notice of a court determination that a refund is due to the member or beneficiary.

(m) The Department of Child Support Services and the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall enter into any agreement necessary to implement this section, which shall include provisions for the department to provide funding to the Public Employees’ Retirement System to develop, implement, and maintain the intercept process described in this section.

(n) The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall not assess service charges on members or
 beneficiaries in order to recover any administrative costs resulting from complying with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 159.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17530.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, this section applies to any actions taken to enforce a judgment or order for support entered as a result of action filed by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400, 17402, or 17404, where it is alleged that the enforcement actions have been taken in error against a person who is not the support obligor named in the judgment or order.

(b) A person claiming that a support enforcement action has been taken against that person, or the person’s wages or assets, in error, shall file a claim of mistaken identity with the local child support agency. The claim shall include verifiable information or documentation
 to establish that the person against whom the enforcement actions have been taken is not the person named in the support order or judgment. The local child support agency shall resolve a claim of mistaken identity submitted pursuant to this section in the same manner and timeframes provided for resolution of a complaint pursuant to Section 17800.

(c) If the local child support agency determines that a claim filed pursuant to this section is meritorious, or if the court enters an order pursuant to Section 17433, the agency shall immediately take the steps necessary to terminate all enforcement activities with respect to the claimant, to return to the claimant any assets seized, to terminate any levying activities or attachment or assignment orders, to release any license renewal or application being withheld pursuant to Section 17520, to
 return any sums paid by the claimant pursuant to the judgment or order, including sums paid to any federal, state, or local government, but excluding sums paid directly to the support obligee, and to ensure that all other
 enforcement agencies and entities cease further actions against the claimant. With respect to a claim filed under this section, the local child support agency shall also provide the claimant with a statement certifying that the claimant is not the support obligor named in the support order or judgment, which statement shall be prima facie evidence of the claimant’s identity in any subsequent enforcement proceedings or actions with respect to that support order or judgment.

(d) If the local child support agency rejects a claim pursuant to this section, or if the agency, after finding a claim to be meritorious, fails to take any of the remedial steps provided in subdivision (c), the claimant may file an action with the superior court to establish the mistaken identity or to obtain the remedies described in subdivision (c), or
 both.

(e) Filing a false claim pursuant to this section shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 160.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.

When a local child support agency closes a child support case containing summary criminal history information, the local child support agency shall delete or purge from the file and destroy any documents or information concerning or arising from offenses for or of which the parent has been arrested, charged, or convicted, other than offenses related to the parent’s having failed to provide support for minor children, no later than four years and four months, or any other timeframe that is consistent with federal regulations controlling child support records retention, after the date the local child support agency closes the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 91.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17540.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2000, the department shall pay only those county claims for federal or state reimbursement under this division which are filed with the department within nine months of the end of the calendar quarter in which the costs are paid. A claim filed after that time may only be paid if the claim falls within the exceptions set forth in federal law.

(2) The department may change the nine-month limitation specified in paragraph (1), as deemed necessary by the department to comply with federal changes which affect time limits for filing a claim.

(b) (1) The department may waive the time limit imposed by subdivision (a) if the department determines there was good cause for a county’s failure to file a claim or claims within the time limit.

(2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, “good cause” means
 circumstances which are beyond the county’s control, including acts of God and documented action or inaction by the state or federal government.

(B) “Circumstances beyond the county’s control” do not include neglect or failure on the part of the county or any of its offices, officers, or employees.

(C) A county shall request a waiver of the time limit imposed by this section for good cause in accordance with regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(3) The department’s authority to waive the time limit under this subdivision shall be subject to the availability of funds and shall not apply to claims submitted more than 18 months after the end of the calendar quarter in which costs were paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 92.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.

(a) The Department of Child Support Services, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall establish regulations by which the local child support agency, in any case of separation or desertion of a parent from a child that results in aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code being granted to the child, may compromise the obligor parent or parents’ liability for public assistance debt, including interest thereon, owed to the state where the child for whom public assistance was paid is residing with the obligor parent, and all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The obligor parent establishes one of the following:

(A) The child has been adjudged a dependent of the court under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the child has been reunified with the obligor parent pursuant to a court order.

(B) The child received public assistance while living with a guardian or relative caregiver and the child has been returned to the custody of the obligor parent, provided that the obligor parent for whom the debt compromise is being considered was the parent with whom the child resided prior to the child’s placement with the guardian or relative caregiver.

(2) The obligor parent, for whom the debt compromise is being considered, has an income less than 250 percent of the
 current federal poverty level.

(3) The local child support agency, pursuant to regulations set
 forth by the department, has determined that the compromise is necessary for the child’s support.

(b) Prior to compromising an obligor parent’s liability for debt incurred for either AFDC-FC payments provided to a child pursuant to Section 11400 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or incurred for CalWORKs payments provided on behalf of a child, the local child support agency shall consult with the county child welfare department.

(c) This section does not relieve an obligor, who has not been reunified with their child, of any liability for public assistance debt.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Guardian” means the legal guardian of the child, who assumed care and control of the child while the child was in the guardian’s control, and who is not a biological or adoptive parent.

(2) “Relative caregiver” means a relative as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 11362 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who assumed primary responsibility for the child while the child was in the relative’s care and control, and who is not a biological or adoptive parent.

(e) The department shall promulgate all necessary regulations pursuant to this section on or before October 1, 2002, including regulations that set forth guidelines to be used by the local child support agency when compromising public assistance debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 161.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17552.

(a) (1) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the Department of Child Support Services, shall promulgate regulations by which the county child welfare department, in any case of separation or desertion of a parent or parents from a child that results in foster care assistance payments under Section 11400 of, or a voluntary placement under Section 11401.1 of, or the payments for a minor child placed in the same home as a minor or nonminor dependent parent under Section 11401.4 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or CalWORKs payments to a caretaker relative of a child who comes within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who has been removed from the parental home and placed with the caretaker relative by court
 order, and who is under the supervision of the county child welfare agency or probation department under Section 11250 of, or Kin-GAP payments under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of, or aid under subdivision (b) of Section 10101 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall determine whether it is in the best interests of the child or nonminor to have the case referred to the local child support agency for child support services. If reunification services are not offered or are terminated, the case may be referred to the local child support agency, unless the child’s permanent plan is legal guardianship with a relative who is receiving Kin-GAP and the payment of support by the parent may compromise the stability of the current placement with the related guardian, or the permanent plan is transitional foster care for the nonminor under Section 11403 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In making the determination, the department regulations shall
 provide the factors the county child welfare department shall consider, including:

(A) Whether the payment of support by the parent will pose a barrier to the proposed reunification, in that the payment of support will compromise the parent’s ability to meet the requirements of the parent’s reunification plan.

(B) Whether the payment of support by the parent will pose a barrier to the proposed reunification in that the payment of support will compromise the parent’s current or future ability to meet the financial needs of the child.

(2) The department’s regulations shall require the county welfare department, in making the determination pursuant to paragraph (1), to presume that the payment of support by the parent is likely to pose a barrier to the proposed reunification.

(b) The department regulations shall provide that, when the county child welfare department determines that it is not in the best interest of the child to seek a support order against the parent, the county child welfare department shall refrain from referring the case to the local child support agency. The regulations shall define those circumstances in which it is not in the best interest of the child to refer the case to the local child support agency. The regulations shall include the presumption described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that the payment of support by the parent is likely to pose a barrier to the proposed reunification.

(c) The department regulations shall provide, when the county child welfare department determines that it is not in the child’s best interest to have the case referred to the local child support agency, the county child welfare department shall
 review that determination periodically to coincide with the redetermination of AFDC-FC eligibility under Section 11401.5 of, or the CalWORKs eligibility under Section 11265 of, or Kin-GAP eligibility under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, and shall refer the child’s case to the local child support agency upon a determination that, due to a change in the child’s circumstances, it is no longer contrary to the child’s best interest to have the case referred to the local child support agency.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who is over 19 years of age, is not a child for purposes of referral to the local child support agency for collection or enforcement of child support.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a minor or a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who has a minor child placed in the same licensed or approved facility pursuant to Section 11401.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is not a parent for purposes of referral to the local child support agency for collection or enforcement of child support.

(f) The State Department of Social Services shall revise its regulations to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision on or before October 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 61.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17555.

(a) Any appropriation made available in the annual Budget Act for the purposes of augmenting funding for local child support agencies in the furtherance of their revenue collection responsibilities shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) Each local child support agency shall submit to the department an early intervention plan with all components to take effect upon receipt of their additional allocation as a result of this proposal.

(2) Funds shall be distributed to counties based on their performance on the following two federal performance measures:

(A) Measure 3:
 Collections on Current Support.

(B) Measure 4: Cases with Collections on Arrears.

(3) A local child support agency shall be required to use and ensure that 100 percent of the new funds allocated are dedicated to maintaining caseworker staffing levels in order to stabilize child support collections.

(4) At the end of each fiscal year that this augmentation is in effect, the department shall provide a report on the cost-effectiveness of this augmentation, including an assessment of caseload changes over time.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to review the results of this augmentation and the level of related appropriation during the legislative budget review process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 38.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17556.

On or before March 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature providing information on the status of all of the following:

(a) Case-to-staff ratios for each local child support agency.

(b) Collections to families and recoupment collections to county, state, and federal governmental agencies.

(c) Cost avoidance benefits.

(d) The number of families served by the child support program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 2.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17560.

(a) The department shall establish and operate a statewide compromise of arrears program pursuant to which the department may accept offers in compromise of child support arrears and interest accrued thereon owed to the state for reimbursement of aid paid pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The program shall operate uniformly across California and shall take into consideration the needs of the children subject to the child support order and the obligor’s ability to pay.

(b) If the obligor owes current child support, the offer in compromise shall require the obligor to be in compliance with the current support order for a set period of time before any arrears and interest accrued thereon may be compromised.

(c) Absent a finding of good cause, or a determination by the director that it is in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, any offer in compromise entered into pursuant to this section shall be rescinded, all compromised liabilities shall be reestablished notwithstanding any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise may be refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department or local child support agency determines that the obligor did any of the following acts regarding the offer in compromise:

(A) Concealed from the department or local child support agency any income, assets, or other property belonging to the obligor or any reasonably anticipated receipt of income, assets, or other property.

(B) Intentionally received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any information, document, or record, or intentionally made any false statement, relating to the financial conditions of the obligor.

(2) The obligor fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions of the offer in compromise.

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 17406, in no event may the administrator, director, or director’s designee within the department, accept an offer in compromise of any child support arrears owed directly to the custodial party unless that party consents to the offer in compromise in writing and participates in the agreement. Prior to giving consent, the custodial party shall be provided with a clear written explanation of the rights with respect to child support arrears owed to the custodial party and the compromise thereof.

(e) Subject to the requirements of this section, the director shall delegate to the administrator of a local child support agency the authority to compromise an amount of child support arrears up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), and may delegate additional authority to compromise up to an amount determined by the director to support the effective administration of the offers in compromise program.

(f) For an amount to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:
